Connecticut, session 2026, HB05071.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Social Services, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June
30, 2027, to increase Medicaid reimbursement rates for private providers
in accordance with phase one of the Medicaid rate study.